Illinois, session 104th, SB1921.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 503)7    Sec. 3. Board; composition; appointments; tenure; 8vacancies. 9    (a) The Board shall be composed of 20 18 members selected 10as follows: The Attorney General of the State of Illinois, the 11Director of the Illinois State Police, the Director of 12Corrections, the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 13Department, the Sheriff of Cook County, the Clerk of the 14Circuit Court of Cook County, who shall serve as ex officio 15members, and the following to be appointed by the Governor: 2 16mayors or village presidents of Illinois municipalities, 2 17Illinois county sheriffs from counties other than Cook County, 182 managers of Illinois municipalities, 2 chiefs of municipal 19police departments in Illinois having no Superintendent of the 20Police Department on the Board, 2 citizens of Illinois who 21shall be members of an organized enforcement officers' 22association, 2 active members of a statewide lodge 23representing law enforcement, one active member of a statewide   SB1921- 2 -LRB104 11888 RTM 21979 b1association representing sheriffs, and one active member of a 2statewide association representing municipal police chiefs. 3The appointments of the Governor shall be made on the first 4Monday of August in 1965 with 3 of the appointments to be for a 5period of one year, 3 for 2 years, and 3 for 3 years except for 6the 2 members added by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly. The 2 members added by this amendatory Act of the 8104th General Assembly shall be appointed on the first Monday 9in August after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 10the 104th General Assembly with one member appointed for 2 11years and one member appointed for 3 years. Their successors 12shall be appointed in like manner for terms to expire the first 13Monday of August each 3 years thereafter. All members shall 14serve until their respective successors are appointed and 15qualify. Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor for the 16unexpired terms. Any ex officio member may appoint a designee 17to the Board who shall have the same powers and immunities 18otherwise conferred to the member of the Board, including the 19power to vote and be counted toward quorum, so long as the 20member is not in attendance.21    (a-5) Within the Board is created a Review Committee. The 22Review Committee shall review disciplinary cases in which the 23Panel, the law enforcement officer, or the law enforcement 24agency file for reconsideration of a decertification decision 25made by the Board. The Review Committee shall be composed of 9 26annually rotating members from the Board appointed by the   SB1921- 3 -LRB104 11888 RTM 21979 b1Board Chairman. One member of the Review Committee shall be 2designated by the Board Chairman as the Chair. The Review 3Committee shall sit in 3 member panels composed of one member 4representing law enforcement management, one member 5representing members of law enforcement, and one member who is 6not a current or former member of law enforcement. 7    (b) When a Board member may have an actual, perceived, or 8potential conflict of interest or appearance of bias that 9could prevent the Board member from making a fair and 10impartial decision regarding decertification:11        (1) The Board member shall recuse himself or herself.12        (2) If the Board member fails to recuse himself or 13    herself, then the Board may, by a simple majority of the 14    remaining members, vote to recuse the Board member. Board 15    members who are found to have voted on a matter in which 16    they should have recused themselves may be removed from 17    the Board by the Governor.18    A conflict of interest or appearance of bias may include, 19but is not limited to, matters where one of the following is a 20party to a decision on a decertification or formal complaint: 21someone with whom the member has an employment relationship; 22any of the following relatives: spouse, parents, children, 23adopted children, legal wards, stepchildren, step parents, 24step siblings, half siblings, siblings, parents-in-law, 25siblings-in-law, children-in-law, aunts, uncles, nieces, and 26nephews; a friend; or a member of a professional organization,   SB1921- 4 -LRB104 11888 RTM 21979 b1association, or a union in which the member now actively 2serves.3    (c) A vacancy in members does not prevent a quorum of the 4remaining sitting members from exercising all rights and 5performing all duties of the Board.6    (d) An individual serving on the Board shall not also 7serve on the Panel. 8(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-694, eff. 1-7-22.)